Hawaii statutes.
§271-10 Reports and decisions of
commission. (a) Whenever the public utilities commission inquires into
the operations, operating rights, rates, or directs inquiry and investigation
into motor carrier activities regulated under this chapter, and holds public
hearing thereon, it shall make a report in writing in respect thereto, which
shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of law, together with its
decision, order, or requirement in the premises.

(b) All reports issued under subsection (a) shall
be entered of record, and a copy thereof shall be furnished to parties of
record in any such proceeding.

(c) The commission may provide for the
publication of its reports and decisions in such form and manner as may be best
adapted for public information and use, and these authorized publications shall
be competent evidence of the reports and decisions of the commission therein
contained in all courts of this State without any further proof or
authentication thereof. The commission may also cause to be printed for early
distribution its annual reports. [L 1961, c 121, pt of §2; Supp, §106C-8; HRS
§271-10; am L Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next